Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3611
Commitment; consent to leave hospital; violation; return; costs paid by county.

Any person committed under the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act who leaves the facility without having been discharged by the attending physician or by court order shall be taken into custody and returned to the facility by the sheriff of any county where such person is found, upon an affidavit being filed with the sheriff by the administrator of the facility or duly authorized officer in charge thereof acting as the duly appointed agent and representative of the department in the matter. The costs of such transportation shall be paid from county general funds of the patient's county of residence. If the person is a nonresident of Nebraska or has no permanent residence, the costs shall be paid from county general funds of the county of commitment.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 11, p. 1277;

Laws 1972, LB 1492, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 662;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 94.